trunk/apertium-cy-en/apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
<pardef n="hew__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
     
    
<pardef n="hid/e__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
       

<pardef n="w/eave__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eave</l>
          <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eave</l>
          <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaves</l>
          <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>oven</l>
          <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaving</l>
          <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaving</l>
          <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaving</l>
          <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
     
    
<pardef n="le/ad__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ads</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ading</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ading</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ading</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
  
    
<pardef n="le/ave__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>aves</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ft</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ft</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
      
    
<pardef n="l/ie__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ay</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ain</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    

                        <e lm="lead"><i>le</i><par n="le/ad__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="lead to"><i>le</i><par n="le/ad__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="leave"><i>le</i><par n="le/ave__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="show"><i>show</i><par n="hew__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="show up"><i>show</i><par n="hew__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="hide"><i>hid</i> <par n="hid/e__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="sew"><i>sew</i> <par n="hew__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="interweave"><i>interw</i><par n="w/eave__vblex"/></e>
